Tennessee, session 114, HB0629.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-128(a), is amended by adding
the following new subdivision:
(3) If the court appoints a person or entity to take charge of a child pursuant to
subdivision (a)(1), then the court may order the child to wear a global positioning
monitoring system device and order the entity that operates the global positioning
monitoring system to notify the appointed person or entity if the child violates the
instructions issued by the court upon release. As used in this subdivision (a)(3), "global
positioning monitoring system" means the same as defined in § 40-11-152.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3401(g), is amended by
redesignating subdivision (g)(5) as subdivision (g)(5)(A), by deleting the language "subdivision
(g)(5)" wherever it appears and substituting instead the language "subdivision (g)(5)(A)", and by
adding the following as a new subdivision (g)(5)(B):
(B)
(i) If a student is expelled for committing a zero tolerance offense for
threatening mass violence on school property or at a school-related activity in
accordance with this section, then the director of schools or the head of the
public charter school shall require the student to undergo counseling and a
mental health evaluation to determine whether the student is a threat to
HB0629
002523
- 1 -

themselves or to others before the student may return to school, regardless of
whether the student has completed the term of the student's expulsion.
(ii) The mental health evaluation required in subdivision (g)(5)(B)(i) must
be conducted on an outpatient basis by a mental health agency or a licensed
private practitioner designated by the commissioner of mental health and
substance abuse services. The evaluator shall report its findings to the director
of schools or the head of the public charter school. A report submitted to a
director of schools or head of a public charter school pursuant to this subdivision
(g)(5)(B)(ii) is confidential and must not be shared with others, except as may
otherwise be required by law.
(iii) The costs of the counseling and mental health evaluation required
pursuant to subdivision (g)(5)(B)(i) must be borne by the student's parents or the
student, if the student is eighteen (18) years of age or older.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-4002(e)(5), is amended by
deleting "§ 49-6-3401(g)(5)" and substituting "§ 49-6-3401(g)(5)(A)".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-4301(a)(3), is amended by
deleting "§ 49-6-3401(g)(5)" and substituting "§ 49-6-3401(g)(5)(A)".
SECTION 5. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to actions occurring on or after that date.
- 2 - 002523